Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.13
Sickness and accident insurance; alteration of application.

No alteration of any written application for any policy of sickness and accident insurance shall be made by any person other than the applicant without his or her written consent, except that insertions may be made by the insurer, for administrative purposes only, in such manner as to indicate clearly that such insertions are not to be ascribed to the applicant.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 14, p. 657;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 143.